Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1330.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 25, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 25-419, to read: START_STATUTE25-419. Right to jury trial; jury findings; priority A. In any legal decision-making or parenting time proceeding in which a parent has been apportioned less than thirty-five percent parenting time or the court has awarded full legal decision-making authority to one parent, the parent who has been awarded less than THIRTY-five percent parenting time or has not been awarded any legal decision-making authority has the right to request a jury trial to determine an award of parenting time or legal decision-making. B. In a contested legal decision-making or parenting time proceeding, the jury shall make specific findings on the record of the factors prescribed in section 25-403, subsection a and the reasons the jury verdict is in the best INTERESTs of the child. C. The request for a jury trial pursuant to this section shall take priority over other civil cases. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Legislative intent The legislature intends that: 1. It shall be the policy of this state that there be an equitable award of parenting time between both parents. 2. An equitable award of parenting time shall include equal parenting time with a child for each parent on all holidays, the child's birthday and both parents' birthdays.